Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-407
State Judge Advocate; appointment.

The Adjutant General shall appoint as State Judge Advocate one of the Senior Staff Judge Advocates from either the Army National Guard or the Air National Guard.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 7, p. 1555.